oo/vimspell/eo.dic
adekvata/ACMVY
administri/ABJLOTY
Adrianon/X
agi/ABjkLOqRrVy
akraa/AW?
Akraon/X
akrobato/FY
aktuali/VY
alfundigi/OTX
aliplaneda/AW
alirebla/EOV
alluti/TY
amara/ACOY
amasmurdi/ABOV
amerika/EW
amoniakecigi/AOTX
ankrumi/AOV
anstataŭi/AFGOQTUXY
Antananarivon/X
antioĥia/AW
aplikeblas/V
apriora/AY
arĝenti/AOTYZ
argonon/AX
aromi/AOVY
Aŝĥabadon/X
asiria/AW
aŭrora/AOV
Averoeson/AX
azova/AW
balasti/AOTY
bangladeŝa/AW
Bangladeŝon/X
bankrotaranĝi/AOV
barejna/AW
Belmopanon/X
benina/AW
bestkuraci/ASV
bezonata/CEOVY
bito/AOX
bjelostoka/AW
bleki/ekV
bonas/MV
bonigi/ALOTBX
bonna/AW
bono/MOUVY
botaniki/ASOVY
briĝtaŭna/AW
brili/ekGMORVY
Bruselon/X
brutobredi/ASV
bukareŝta/AW
buŝa/AY
ĉefetno/ACOW
ĉenlabori/AOV
cento/AlNOX
cenzurita/CEY
ĉifri/AMOSTBY
cipra/AW
ĉirpi/AV
Ĉurĉa/AOX
datumregistri/ALOV
Deboran/X
debruli/VY
degeli/AGOVY
deklinacii/OQTY
delta/AOV
densa/ACJLMGOQY
devii/OVB
dia/CFGKOQSYZ
diasporo/AOW
dimensia/ACNnY
disheligi/AOTX
diskrimini/LV
diversa/ACGVY
Dohaon/X
dormegi/AOVB
dublina/AW
dunombro/AOY
Edinburgon/X
egalvalora/AOV
egipta/CFGQY
ekploregi/V
ekstremo/OYZ
Elbon/AX
eligi/ALORTvY
Elizabeto/AOW
elkoviĝi/V
elorbitigi/TX
elpensi/ABDOTY
emfazenda/MY
endanĝerigi/AOTX
enhakiĝi/AOV
enkapigi/AOTX
enmagazenigi/AOTX
enstomakigi/AOTX
enteksi/TY
Esperanto-kurso/AOW
establi/AOQRTY
Ester’/X
estintas/V
eŭropa/CEWY
eventuala/ACOY
fakĵargona/AOVY
fantasta/AOY
fantomi/AOV
fenestri/VY
fibro/OeY
fieregi/AOV
Fiĝion/X
fingra/ANnY
finnlanda/AW
fleksita/CEY_
floru/kRVz
fonti/VY
fosforeski/AV
franceska/AOY
Frankonion/X
fritaŭna/AW
fundo/AOY
funebri/ASOUVY
Gehenon/X
ĝeneva/AW
ĝermano/FuY
gesti/ABOV
ĝiismon/AXW
gotiko/OY
graŭli/AOV
gregigi/AjOTX
greziljona/AW
ĝuinda/Y
Gvineon/X
haga/AW
halti/AGkOV
Ĥanukon/AX
ĥartuma/AW
hejtligno/AOY
hierarkio/OY
Himalajon/AX
ĥiromancio/AOWS
hordea/AOY
ĥoro/AJOVSWY
humanistikon/AX
identa/ACOVY
Ilirion/AX
injekti/AOLTY
inkandeski/ACGV
interlingvaa/AOWYZ
intertrakti/AOVY
Israelon/X
istanbula/AW
ĵaztrupo/AOW
Jekaterinburgo/AOXW
judisma/W
jungi/ATY
ĵurrompi/AOV
Kaabon/X
kaledonia/AW
Kansason/X
kapela/AOW
kapoklini/AOV
karakterizi/LTY
kebekia/AW
Kenjon/X
kibici/AV
kinŝasa/AW
Klaŭdion/AX
knabina/ACJOY
kohorto/AOW
kolazioni/AOV?
komisiono/AOW_
kompensi/AOLTY
konformi/MVB
konfuzegi/AOQTY
kongregacia/AWO
kontakto/OY
kontroleblon/EX
konversacii/AOV
korelacia/AOY
kornvala/AW
kreola/AOQY
kreski/AGJOVY
krimea/AW
kromion/AX
kulti/AJOTYZ
kuriumon/AX
kuŝaĉi/hV
laki/AOTY
Lapazon/X
larmi/AGOV
latinidlingva/ACW
Lenino/AOX
lerni/BDJLOY
libana/AW
lilongva/AW
Lisbonon/X
liturgio/AOY
loklingva/AW
longas/MV
mababana/AW
Mababanon/X
makrofamilio/AOW
malbonigi/AORTBX
malvarmumi/AOV
managva/AW
manĝa/AcOY
Martinikon/X
maskata/AW
mava/ACY?
meki/AOV
meksiklanda/AW
meme/X
mikronezia/AW
milithelpon/AX
mirinda/AeGVY
modalo/AOY
Molieron/AX
mondumo/AOW
movada/EW
murornamo/AOY
muziki/ASOLGBVY
Namibon/AX
nasaŭa/AW
nenifari/ABFUV
Nestoron/AX
niameja/AW
nieli/AOTY
nordafrika/AW
Nord-Dakoton/X
novkaledonia/AW
Novlandon/AX
obscena/ACOUY
obstina/ACOUV
Odiseon/AX
omska/AW
Orienteŭropon/XA
origini/AOV
ortodoksismo/W
paĉulo/AOY
Pamiron/X
paramariba/AW
parenco/ACFKQV
pasinta/CEOY
paŭti/V
pensiuligi/TX
perloĉasi/AOV
perua/AW
perversa/ABCGOQUY
Pitagoron/X
pivotegi/AOV
plifruigi/ATX
plikomplikigi/AOTXY
ploru/kOV
pluso/AOX
pollingva/AW
Portospenon/X
postnaska/AY
povinti/V
praga/AW
preterportiĝi/OV
prilabori/RTY
programtraduki/ALOV
Protagoron/AX
prunti/AadOTYy
radieti/AOV
ralio/AOW
raspi/ALTJY
Raŭmon/X
re-eniri/AVO
resanigi/ALOTX
reta/EW
revi/DOUV
rikolto/AOYy
rivali/CV
ruanda/AW
Ruĝkufulineton/X
rumano/CFGQY
ŝajni/kGOV
salvadoria/AW
samfamilia/AW
samoa/AW
samreligia/EMW
sangadulti/AOV
sanktgeorga/AW
sanktigi/AORTX
sciencfikcia/AOY
seksi/CLOVY
sekto/ACOWZ
Ŝem’/X
sepia/AOY
siesti/AOV
Ŝiler’/X
singapura/AW
ŝipservi/ASV
Skopjon/X
skulpti/ADLSTY
ŝnursalti/AV
socina/AWZ?
spiralfali/V
SPIV-a/AOY
Srilankon/X
stepa/AOW
ŝtormi/AOV
struto/FY
Sud-Eŭropon/XA
sukra/AW
superbordiĝi/AOV
surfaco/AOY
surmerkatigi/AOTX
Svislandon/X
ŝviteti/AGOV
taĉmento/AOW
taŭo/AOX?
tbilisa/AW
teksi/ASLTJOY
teksobrodi/V
terminfara/ABUVS
Tibeton/X
tiflisa/AW
Toledon/X
tomska/AW
trafebla/EmOY
trafikplani/AOV
traŝvitigi/AOTX
tremeti/AOV
tropiklanda/AW
TTT-apliko/AOY
turbuli/ABV
Turing’/X
universitata/AOW
Usonon/X
uzinda/CEY
valeta/AW
vasta/ACMVGQY
vastigi/ATXz
vespermanĝi/AOV
vestfalia/AW
vida/ABDGORY
Vilnon/X
violonas/V
volapuki/ACGUVWY
Zamenhof’/X
